Washington statutes.
RCW 42.14.070

Officers of political subdivisions.

The legislative authority of each political subdivision, subject to the provisions of this chapter, shall adopt rules and regulations providing for appointment of temporary interim successors to the elected and appointed offices of the political subdivisions.

[ 1963 c 203 s 8.]